Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-919
Retirement system; membership; employees of postsecondary schools excluded.

Any person who is employed by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, or a community college board of governors shall not come under the provisions of the School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 13, p. 643;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2913;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 447, p. 845;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 22;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1513;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 554;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 15.